California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(4) One hundred cases in any county with greater than 1 percent and less than or equal to 3 percent of the Medi-Cal cases.

(5) One hundred twenty-five cases in any county with greater than 3 percent and less than or equal to 10 percent of the Medi-Cal cases.

(6) Six hundred fifty cases in any county with greater than 10 percent of the Medi-Cal cases.

(d) When family members maintain separate residences, but eligibility is determined as a single unit because of the provisions of Section 14008, the county in which the parent or parents reside shall determine the eligibility for the entire unit.

(e) In administering the provisions of law and regulations related to eligibility
 determination the director shall impose such fiscal penalties as provided by this section to assure adequate county administrative performance.

(f) The director shall hold counties financially liable for payments made on behalf of ineligible persons or persons with an incorrect
 spend down of excess income. When a sample case is found to include an ineligible person or a person with an understated spend down of excess income, written notification shall be sent to the county department that describes the error and requests a written response within two weeks. The county shall indicate whether it agrees or disagrees with the findings. If the county disagrees, the department shall reevaluate the error findings, taking into consideration any additional facts contained in the county’s response. The department shall again notify the county of the
 department’s findings. If the county continues to disagree with the error findings, the county may appeal to the Chief of the Medi-Cal Policy Division, requesting that the department review the case and render a final decision. The director may reduce or waive the fiscal liability of a county if the department is unable to meet the minimum sample required, as defined in subdivision (c), or if an individual county experienced a natural disaster, job actions, or other occurrences that impacted the findings in an individual county as determined by the director.

(g) The department shall utilize the methodology detailed in this subdivision to establish counties’ fiscal penalties. The department shall determine each county’s case error rate for each review
 period by dividing the number of completed case reviews in that county found in error by the number of case reviews in that county. State caused errors shall be determined by the department and shall not be included in this calculation. Case error rates shall be arrayed from highest to lowest. From this array, the department shall determine the percentage of counties liable as follows:

(1) The 60 percent of counties with the highest case error rates shall be liable if the state’s dollar error rate exceeds the federal standard by 0.01 percent to 1 percent.

(2) The 70 percent of counties with the highest case error rates shall be liable if the state’s dollar error rate exceeds the federal standard by greater than 1 percent and less than or equal to 2 percent.

(3) The 80 percent of counties with the highest case error
 rates shall be liable if the state’s dollar error rate exceeds the federal standard by greater than 2 percent and less than or equal to 3 percent.

(4) The 90 percent of counties with the highest case error rates shall be liable if the state’s dollar error rate exceeds the federal standard by greater than 3 percent and less than or equal to 4 percent.

(5) All counties shall be liable if the state’s dollar error rate exceeds the federal standard by greater than 4 percent.

As used herein, “the state’s dollar error rate” means the Medicaid dollar error rate reported to the department by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, less any portion of this error rate attributable to state caused errors. The term “federal standard” means the Medicaid dollar error rate standard to which the state is held accountable.

For each county determined liable, the department shall calculate a penalty multiple
 that shall be the product of a liable county’s case error rate multiplied by the liable county’s percentage of statewide Medi-Cal cases. Each county’s fiscal penalty shall be the product of a county’s penalty multiple divided by the sum of all penalty multiples, multiplied times the penalty bank. The penalty bank includes only quality control federal fiscal sanctions, federal withholds, federal disallowances, and any associated General Fund expenditures, minus the value of any state assumed errors and the General Fund share of the value of client caused errors. The case error rate and penalty multiple shall be adjusted by excluding client errors for the purpose of determining the associated General Fund expenditures.

If, after the department has assessed penalties to counties, the federal government reduces or eliminates any quality control federal fiscal sanction, federal withhold or federal disallowance, the department
 shall reduce or eliminate the corresponding fiscal penalty assessment including any associated General Fund expenditures to liable counties.

(h) When a county welfare department contravenes state eligibility processing regulations and written instructions in a way that produces increased program benefits or administrative expenses but doesn’t result in an increase in the eligibility dollar error rate, the director shall recoup from that county the additional administrative or program benefit costs above those
 that would have been incurred had that county not contravened the established state eligibility processing regulations and written instructions. This section shall not be construed to interfere with the rights of counties to out-station eligibility staff.

Notwithstanding the number of counties determined liable for fiscal penalties under this section, individual county corrective action plans as prescribed by the department shall be required from all counties that exceed a 15 percent case error rate.

(i) Any penalties imposed under this system shall be collected through direct repayment from liable counties rather than through any reduction in funds otherwise due to
 counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 117.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.1.

If a patient at a health facility operated by the county either directly or through contract is received in a comatose condition or suffering from amnesia and dies before he is able to cooperate in providing information necessary to a determination of Medi-Cal eligibility, the patient shall be presumed eligible. However, such presumption may be rebutted by the department. All costs incurred in providing care to such patient under such presumption shall be reimbursable to the extent permitted by federal statutes and regulations. If such a patient subsequently is determined ineligible, the department shall make reasonable efforts to recover the costs of care incurred during the
 period of presumptive eligibility and shall have the right to seek restitution in a civil action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 101.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.2.

(a) If a person who is incapable of acting on their own behalf and who would otherwise be eligible is discontinued from Medi-Cal eligibility because the guardian or authorized representative of the person fails or refuses to provide information needed to determine eligibility, then anyone with knowledge of the person’s need for Medi-Cal coverage may apply for retroactive eligibility for
 the applicable retroactive eligibility period described in Section 14019 on behalf of the person. If the necessary information becomes available within three months of the application, the county department shall act on the application to determine the person’s eligibility for the retroactive period.

(b) A provision of subdivision (a)
 shall become inoperative to the extent that
 it is found to conflict with federal requirements governing federal reimbursements of state Medicaid costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 80.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.3.

The department shall provide technical assistance to counties in order to maximize the identification of private health care coverage as defined by Section 10020. A county agency shall receive reimbursement for the administrative costs for properly completing a form which identifies such private health care coverage only in those cases where the agency does not receive such reimbursement from the department or the State Department of Social Services. The administrative costs for properly completing the form shall be determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 102, Sec. 105.   Effective June 28, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.4.

The department may enter into an agreement with a county to have the county detect and recover the value of any Medi-Cal benefits which have been improperly received or obtained by any person. Counties shall receive an incentive amount not to exceed 30 percent of the amount remaining after reasonable county costs of the recovery have been deducted from the amount recovered. As the single state agency for state plan purposes, the department is responsible for and has authority to impose procedural requirements necessary for federal compliance.

The administrative costs for the
 implementation of this section shall be controlled by the department. The department shall establish and maintain a plan whereby costs for counties’ administration of beneficiary collections will be effectively controlled. The plan shall establish standards and performance criteria, including workload, productivity, and support services standards, to which counties shall adhere.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1052, Sec. 3.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.5.

(a) At the time of determining or redetermining the eligibility of a Medi-Cal program or Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC) program applicant or beneficiary who resides in an area served by a managed health care plan or pilot program in which beneficiaries may enroll, each applicant or beneficiary shall be informed of the managed care and fee-for-service options available regarding methods of
 receiving Medi-Cal benefits.

(b) The information described in subdivision (a) shall include all of the following elements:

(1) Each beneficiary or eligible applicant shall be informed that he or she may choose to continue an established patient-provider relationship in the fee-for-service sector.

(2) Each beneficiary or eligible applicant shall be provided with the name, address, telephone number, and specialty, if any, of each primary care provider, and each clinic participating in each prepaid managed health care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider option. This information shall be provided under geographic area designations, in alphabetical order by the name of the primary care provider and clinic. The name, address, and telephone number of each specialist participating in each prepaid
 managed health care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider option shall be made available by contacting either the health care options contractor or the prepaid managed health care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider.

(3) Each beneficiary or eligible applicant shall be informed that he or she may choose to continue an established patient-provider relationship in a managed care option, if his or her treating provider is a primary care provider or clinic contracting with any of the prepaid managed health care plans, pilot projects, or fee-for-service case management provider options available, has available capacity, and agrees to continue to treat that beneficiary or applicant.

(4) In areas specified by the director, each beneficiary or eligible applicant shall be informed that if he or she fails to make a choice, or does not
 certify that he or she has an established relationship with a primary care provider or clinic, he or she shall be assigned to, and enrolled in, a prepaid managed health care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider.

(c) No later than 30 days following the date a Medi-Cal or AFDC beneficiary or applicant is determined eligible, the beneficiary or applicant shall indicate his or her choice in writing, as a condition of coverage for Medi-Cal benefits, of either of the following health care options:

(1) To obtain benefits by receiving a Medi-Cal card, which may be used to obtain services from individual providers, that the beneficiary would locate, that choose to provide services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

The department may require each beneficiary or eligible applicant, as a condition for electing this option, to
 sign a statement certifying that he or she has an established patient-provider relationship, or in the case of a dependent, the parent or guardian shall make that certification. This certification shall not require the acknowledgment or guarantee of acceptance, by any indicated Medi-Cal provider or health facility, of any beneficiary making a certification under this section.

(2) (A) To obtain benefits by enrolling in a prepaid managed health care plan, pilot program, or fee-for-service case management provider that has agreed to make Medi-Cal services readily available to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(B) At the time the beneficiary or eligible applicant selects a prepaid managed health care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider, the department shall, when applicable, encourage the beneficiary or eligible applicant to also
 indicate, in writing, his or her choice of primary care provider or clinic contracting with the selected prepaid managed health care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider.

(d) (1) In areas specified by the director, a Medi-Cal or AFDC beneficiary or eligible applicant who does not make a choice, or who does not certify that he or she has an established relationship with a primary care provider or clinic, shall be assigned to and enrolled in an appropriate Medi-Cal managed care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider providing service within the area in which the beneficiary resides.

(2) If it is not possible to enroll the beneficiary under a Medi-Cal managed care plan, pilot project, or a fee-for-service case management provider because of a lack of capacity or availability of participating contractors, the
 beneficiary shall be provided with a Medi-Cal card and informed about fee-for-service primary care providers who do all of the following:

(A) The providers agree to accept Medi-Cal patients.

(B) The providers provide information about the provider’s willingness to accept Medi-Cal patients as described in Section 14016.6.

(C) The providers provide services within the area in which the beneficiary resides.

(e) If a beneficiary or eligible applicant does not choose a primary care provider or clinic, or does not select any primary care provider who is available, the managed health care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider that was selected by or assigned to the beneficiary shall ensure that the beneficiary selects a primary care
 provider or clinic within 30 days after enrollment or is assigned to a primary care provider within 40 days after enrollment.

(f) (1) The managed care plan shall have a valid Medi-Cal contract, adequate capacity, and appropriate staffing to provide health care services to the beneficiary.

(2) The department shall establish standards for all of the following:

(A) The maximum distances a beneficiary is required to travel to obtain primary care services from the managed care plan, fee-for-service case management provider, or pilot project in which the beneficiary is enrolled.

(B) The conditions under which a primary care service site shall be accessible by public transportation.

(C) The conditions under which a managed care plan, fee-for-service case management provider, or pilot project shall provide nonmedical transportation to a primary care service site.

(3) In developing the standards required by paragraph (2), the department shall take into account, on a geographic basis, the means of transportation used and distances typically traveled by Medi-Cal beneficiaries to obtain fee-for-service primary care services and the experience of managed care plans in delivering services to Medi-Cal enrollees. The department shall also consider the provider’s ability to render culturally and linguistically appropriate services.

(g) To the extent possible, the arrangements for carrying out subdivision (d) shall provide for the equitable distribution of Medi-Cal beneficiaries among participating managed care plans, fee-for-service case management
 providers, and pilot projects.

(h) If, under the provisions of subdivision (d), a Medi-Cal beneficiary or applicant does not make a choice or does not certify that he or she has an established relationship with a primary care provider or clinic, the person may, at the option of the department, be provided with a Medi-Cal card or be assigned to and enrolled in a managed care plan providing service within the area in which the beneficiary resides.

(i) Any Medi-Cal or AFDC beneficiary who is dissatisfied with the provider or managed care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider shall be allowed to select or be assigned to another provider or managed care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider.

(j) The department or its contractor shall notify a managed care plan, pilot
 project, or fee-for-service case management provider when it has been selected by or assigned to a beneficiary. The managed care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider that has been selected by, or assigned to, a beneficiary, shall notify the primary care provider or clinic that it has been selected or assigned. The managed care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider shall also notify the beneficiary of the managed care plan, pilot project, or fee-for-service case management provider or clinic selected or assigned.

(k) (1) The department shall ensure that Medi-Cal beneficiaries eligible under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act are provided with information about options available regarding methods of receiving Medi-Cal benefits as described in subdivision (c).

(2) (A) The
 director may waive the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d) until a means is established to directly provide the information described in subdivision (a) to beneficiaries who are eligible for the federal Supplemental Security Income for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled Program (Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(B) The director may elect not to apply the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d) to beneficiaries whose eligibility under the Supplemental Security Income program is established before January 1, 1994.

(l) In areas where there is no prepaid managed health care plan or pilot program that has contracted with the department to provide services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries, and where no other enrollment requirements have been established by the department, no explicit choice need be made, and the
 beneficiary or eligible applicant shall receive a Medi-Cal card.

(m) The following definitions contained in this subdivision shall control the construction of this section, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1) “Applicant,” “beneficiary,” and “eligible applicant,” in the case of a family group, mean any person with legal authority to make a choice on behalf of dependent family members.

(2) “Fee-for-service case management provider” means a provider enrolled and certified to participate in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service case management program the department may elect to develop in selected areas of the state with the assistance of and in cooperation with California physician providers and other interested provider groups.

(3) “Managed health care
 plan” and “managed care plan” mean a person or entity operating under a Medi-Cal contract with the department under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) to provide, or arrange for, health care services for Medi-Cal beneficiaries as an alternative to the Medi-Cal fee-for-service program that has a contractual responsibility to manage health care provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries covered by the contract.

(n) (1) Whenever a county welfare department notifies a public assistance recipient or Medi-Cal beneficiary that the recipient or beneficiary is losing Medi-Cal eligibility, the county shall include, in the notice to the recipient or beneficiary, notification that the loss of eligibility shall also result in the recipient’s or beneficiary’s disenrollment from Medi-Cal managed health care or dental plans, if enrolled.

(2) Whenever the
 department or the county welfare department processes a change in a public assistance recipient’s or Medi-Cal beneficiary’s residence or aid code that will result in the recipient’s or beneficiary’s disenrollment from the managed health care or dental plan in which he or she is currently enrolled, a written notice shall be given to the recipient or beneficiary.

(o) This section shall be implemented in a manner consistent with any federal waiver required to be obtained by the department in order to implement this section.

(p) (1) If the functionality is available in the California Healthcare Eligibility, Enrollment, and Retention System (CalHEERS), individuals or their authorized representatives may select Medi-Cal managed care plans via CalHEERS.

(A) Any person that assists a Medi-Cal
 beneficiary who is eligible for the program based on modified adjusted gross income (MAGI) to select a Medi-Cal managed care plan via CalHEERS shall complete a training program that includes all of the following:

(i) The right to select a plan, to designate a plan at a later date, to have plan choice materials sent by mail, and that if the person does not select a plan, one will be selected for them.

(ii) All plan enrollment options and requirements with regard to MAGI Medi-Cal eligibility.

(iii) Any applicable timeframes in which the plan choice must be designated and the mechanism for designating plan choice.

(iv) How to use provider directories, how to identify which providers are in a particular plan network, and the applicable characteristics of
 primary care and specialty care providers and providers of other services, such as languages spoken, whether they are accepting new patients, and office locations.

(v) To the extent applicable, how to access Medi-Cal services prior to plan enrollment, including the right to retroactive Medi-Cal benefits.

(B) Any person that assists a Medi-Cal beneficiary who is not eligible for Medi-Cal on the basis of MAGI to select a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall complete a training program that includes all of the following:

(i) All of the information included in the training program described in subparagraph (A).

(ii) The enrollment options and requirements with regard to each Medi-Cal eligibility category, including whether enrollment is mandatory, how to obtain
 medical exemptions and continuity of care, waiver programs, carved-out services, and the California Children’s Services Program, as applicable.

(2) The department shall consult with a group of stakeholders through either a group currently in existence or convened for this purpose that includes representatives of plans, providers, consumer advocates, counties, eligibility workers, CalHEERS, the California Health Benefit Exchange (Exchange), and the Legislature to review process, timelines, scripts, training curricula, monitoring and oversight plans, and plan marketing and informational materials.

(3) In developing materials, scripts, and processes, the department and the Exchange shall consult with or test the materials, scripts, and processes with stakeholders that have expertise in health plan selection, and in assisting populations of diverse demographic characteristics such as
 race, ethnicity, language spoken, geographic region, sexual orientation, and gender identity or preference.

(4) The department, CalHEERS, the Exchange, and counties may adopt the recommendations of the advisory body convened in paragraph (2) and specify the reasons if the recommendations are not adopted.

(q) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 20.   (AB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Section operative January 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.51.

Upon the availability of federal funding, the department shall modify the Medi-Cal program mail-in application form, and other appropriate materials, and the single point-of-entry application form, to allow applicants in counties served by managed care plans to contact the enrollment contractor by using the Health Care Options toll-free telephone number to request and receive enrollment materials before a Medi-Cal eligibility determination has been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 225.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.55.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are required to enroll in a Medi-Cal managed care health plan make an informed choice that is not the result of confusion, lack of information, or understanding of the choices available to them.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department strive to increase the level of choice of Medi-Cal beneficiaries required to enroll in a Medi-Cal managed care health plan and that default rates be no
 greater than 20 percent in any participating county.

(c) In any county in which conversion to managed care plan enrollment has taken place and where the default rate, as defined in subdivision (e), is 20 percent or higher in two consecutive months occurring after conversion upon the effective date of this section, the department shall conduct a one-time survey of beneficiaries aimed at determining the reasons why beneficiaries fail to enroll into a managed care plan when required to do so by the department or its health care options contractor.

(d) The department shall submit the results of the survey to the appropriate legislative policy and budget committees within six months of completion, and implement a plan of correction intended to reduce the rate of beneficiary default. The plan of correction may include, but not be limited to, culturally appropriate outreach and education
 activities, including the use of community based organization.

(e) For purposes of this section, “default rate” refers to the rate of Medi-Cal beneficiaries defaulting into managed care health plan enrollment by virtue of their failure to make an election, as provided for in Section 14016.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310, Sec. 78.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.6.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall develop a program to implement subdivision (p) of Section 14016.5 and to provide information and assistance to enable Medi-Cal beneficiaries to understand and successfully use the services of the Medi-Cal managed care plans in which they enroll. The program shall include, but not be limited to, the following components:

(a) (1) Development of a method to inform beneficiaries and applicants of all of the following:

(A) Their choices for receiving Medi-Cal benefits including the use of fee-for-service sector managed health care plans, or pilot programs.

(B) The availability of staff and information resources to Medi-Cal managed health care plan enrollees described in subdivision (f).

(2) (A) Marketing and informational materials, including printed materials, films, and exhibits, to be provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and applicants when choosing methods of receiving health care benefits.

(B) The department shall not be responsible for the costs of developing material
 required by subparagraph (A).

(C) (i) The department may prescribe the format and edit the informational materials for factual accuracy, objectivity, and comprehensibility.

(ii) The department, the California Health Benefit Exchange (Exchange), the California Healthcare Eligibility, Enrollment, and Retention System (CalHEERS), and entities or persons designated pursuant to subdivision (g) shall use the edited materials in informing beneficiaries and applicants of their choices for receiving Medi-Cal benefits.

(b) Provision of information that is necessary to implement this program in a manner that fairly and objectively explains to beneficiaries and applicants their choices for methods of receiving Medi-Cal benefits, including information prepared by the department.

(c) Provision of information about providers who will provide services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries. This may be information about provider referral services of a local provider professional organization. The information shall be made available to Medi-Cal beneficiaries and applicants at the same time the beneficiary or applicant is being informed of the options available for receiving care.

(d) Training of individuals, including county human services staff, to carry out the program.

(e) Monitoring the implementation of the program at any location, including online at the Exchange or at counties, where choices are made available in order to assure that beneficiaries and applicants may make a well-informed choice, without duress.

(f) Staff and information
 resources dedicated to directly assist Medi-Cal managed health care plan enrollees to understand how to effectively use the services of, and resolve problems or complaints involving, their managed health care plans.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the department, in consultation with the Exchange, may authorize specific persons or entities, including counties, to provide information to beneficiaries concerning their health care options for receiving Medi-Cal benefits and assistance with enrollment. This subdivision shall apply in all geographic areas designated by the director. This subdivision shall be implemented in a manner consistent with federal law.

(h) To the extent otherwise required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later
 than July 1, 2015. The department may thereafter readopt the emergency regulations pursuant to that chapter. The adoption and readoption, by the department, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 22) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 442, Sec. 11.   (SB 28)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.7.

(a) Managed care contracts entered into by the department under the act adding this section shall include all of the following: 

(1) Contractor requirements concerning eligibility and coverage verification. 

(2) Utilization controls. 

(3) Claims processing. 

(b) The contract requirements shall include all of the following: 

(1) Standards for prompt response to provider requests for information. 

(2) Twenty-four hour response to emergency service authorization requests. 

(3) Use of commonly accepted billing forms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 95, Sec. 4.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.8.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the right of every patient to receive basic information necessary to give full and informed consent is a fundamental tenet of good public health policy and has long been the established law of this state. Some hospitals and other providers do not provide a full range of reproductive health services and may prohibit or otherwise not provide sterilization, infertility treatments, abortion, or contraceptive services, including emergency contraception. It is the intent of the Legislature that every
 patient be given full and complete information about the health care services available to allow patients to make well informed health care decisions.

(b) On or before July 1, 2001, the department shall:

(1) Ensure that all Medi-Cal beneficiaries receive the following statement by the methods described in paragraphs (2) to (6), inclusive:

“Some hospitals and other providers do not provide one or more of the following services that may be covered under your plan contract and that you or your family member might need: family planning; contraceptive services, including emergency contraception; sterilization, including tubal ligation at the time of labor and delivery; infertility treatments; or abortion. You should obtain more information before you enroll. Call your prospective doctor or clinic, or call the Medi-Cal managed care plan at
 (insert the plan’s membership services number or other appropriate number that individuals can call for information) to ensure that you can obtain the health care services that you need.”

(2) Require that each Medi-Cal managed care plan provide the statement described in paragraph (1), in at least 12-point boldface type at the beginning of each provider directory.

(3) Require that each Medi-Cal managed care plan place the statement described in paragraph (1) in a prominent location on any provider directory posted on the plan’s website, if any, and include this statement in a conspicuous place in the plan’s evidence of coverage and disclosure forms, if any.

(4) Require that the statement described in paragraph (1) be included in the health care option activities described in Sections 14016.5, 14087.305, subdivision
 (e) of Section 14089, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14408.

(5) Require each county organized health system to provide to Medi-Cal beneficiaries the statement described in paragraph (1). This statement shall be provided in writing in at least 12-point boldface type prior to enrollment, prior to selection of a primary care provider, and on an annual basis.

(6) Ensure that the statement described in paragraph (1) is provided to any other Medi-Cal managed care beneficiary who would not receive the statement under the provisions of paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive. This statement shall be provided in writing in at least 12-point boldface type prior to enrollment, prior to selection of a primary care provider, and on an annual basis.

(c) The requirement to provide the statement described in paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (b) shall apply to Medi-Cal managed care programs, including, but not limited to, the following programs:

(1) In areas where the department is contracting with persons or entities that are contracting with, or governed, owned, or operated by, either a county board of supervisors or a county special commission, or a county health authority, operating under Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5) or Article 7 (commencing with Section 14490) of Chapter 8, or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 101675) of Part 4 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) In areas specified by the director for expansion of the Medi-Cal managed care program under Section 14087.3, including where the department is contracting with prepaid health plans, including prepaid health plans that are contracting with, governed, owned, or operated by a county board of supervisors, a
 county special commission or county health authority authorized by Sections 14018.7, 14087.31, 14087.316, 14087.35, 14087.36, 14087.38, and 14087.9605.

(3) Where the department has entered into contracts with prepaid health plans or primary care case management providers pursuant to Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088) and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(4) Where the department or the California Medical Assistance Commission has entered into contracts with any persons or entities pursuant to Section 14087.47, Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089), or Article 2.97 (commencing with Section 14093).

(d) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall not be required to provide the statement described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) in a service area in which none of the hospitals, health facilities,
 clinics, medical groups, or independent practice associations with which it contracts limit or restrict any of the reproductive services described in the statement.

(e) This section shall not apply to specialized health care service plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 347, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.9.

Where determined to be cost effective, the department shall utilize the earnings clearance system to verify the eligibility of persons who have applied for or are receiving benefits pursuant to Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1354, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14016.10.

The department shall implement the federal requirement under Section 4603 of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990 (P.L. 101–508) which provides for the continuity of Medi-Cal coverage during pregnancy and the post partum period for pregnant women who were certified as Medi-Cal eligible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1062, Sec. 1.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14017.

On a regional pilot project basis, the department may issue an identification card to a person eligible for Medi-Cal program benefits under Section 14005.1, 14005.4, or 14005.7 who is certified, but is not in possession of a valid California driver’s license or identification card issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles. The identification card shall contain his or her picture, social security number, identifying characteristics, and signature. This provision shall not apply to:

(a) Persons age 12 and under.

(b) Recipients of aid under Title XVI of the Social Security Act.

(c) Persons in long-term institutional status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 327, Sec. 224.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14017.1.

The Joint Legislative Audit Committee shall conduct an audit of one or more county eligibility departments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 247.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14017.5.

The department shall not issue identification cards to Medi-Cal recipients on a statewide basis until (1) a pilot project has been completed which indicates that the General Fund savings from reduced unauthorized use of Medi-Cal cards more than offsets the costs of issuing the identification cards, and (2) the Legislature has specifically appropriated the funds necessary to issue identification cards to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.
